Louisiana, session 2026, HB54.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:574.7(B)(4) and (C)(2)(b) are hereby amended and reenacted and
R.S. 15:574.7(C)(2)(c) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§574.7. Custody and supervision of parolees; modification or suspension of
supervision; violation of conditions of parole; sanctions; alternative
conditions; administrative sanctions
* * *
B.
* * *
(4) For purposes of this Subsection, "technical violation" means any violation
of a condition of parole as defined in R.S. 15:574.9(G)(2) R.S. 15:574.9(H)(2).
* * *
C.(1)
* * *
(2) Upon receiving a summary of the prerevocation proceeding, the
committee may order the following:
* * *
(b) As an alternative to revocation, that the parolee, as a condition of parole,
be committed to a community rehabilitation center or a substance abuse treatment
program operated by, or under contract with, the department, for a period of time not
to exceed six months, without benefit of good time, provided that such commitment
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 54 ENROLLED
does not extend the period of parole beyond the full parole term. Upon written
request of the department that the offender be removed for violations of the rules or
regulations of the community rehabilitation center or substance abuse program, the
committee shall order that the parole be revoked, with credit for time served in the
community rehabilitation center. That the parolee, as an alternative to revocation
and as a condition of parole, be committed to any of the following that is deemed
appropriate by the board and operated by or under contract with the department:
(i) A community rehabilitation center.
(ii) A substance abuse treatment program.
(iii) A mental health treatment program.
(iv) A certified treatment and rehabilitation program as provided in R.S.
15:828.
(c) The commitment authorized pursuant to Subparagraph (b) of this
Paragraph shall be for a period not to exceed one year and shall be without benefit
of good time, provided that such commitment does not extend the period of parole
beyond the full parole term. Upon written request of the department that the parolee
be removed for violations of the rules or regulations of the rehabilitation center or
program he has been committed to, the committee shall order that the parole be
revoked with credit for time served in the rehabilitation center or program.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.